Illinois, session 104th, SB3169.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Sections 5.1038 and 6z-149 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)7    Sec. 5.1038. The Community Land Trust Fund. 8    (30 ILCS 105/6z-149 new)9    Sec. 6z-149. The Community Land Trust Fund; creation. The 10Community Land Trust Fund is created as a special fund in the 11State treasury. The Fund may accept moneys from any lawful 12source. Any interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall be 13deposited into the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used by 14the Illinois Housing Development Authority for development, 15staffing, and capacity building and technical assistance 16related to community land trusts in the State. As used in this 17Section, "community land trust" has the meaning given to that 18term in the Community Land Trust Home Ownership Act. 19    Section 10. The Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax Act is 20amended by changing Sections 3 and 6 as follows:   SB3169- 2 -LRB104 20474 HLH 33944 b1    (35 ILCS 145/3)  (from Ch. 120, par. 481b.33)2    Sec. 3. Rate; exemptions. 3    (a) A tax is imposed upon hotel operators at the rate of 5% 4of 94% of the gross rental receipts from engaging in business 5as a hotel operator, excluding, however, from gross rental 6receipts, the proceeds of renting, leasing or letting hotel 7rooms to permanent residents of a hotel and proceeds from the 8tax imposed under subsection (c) of Section 13 of the 9Metropolitan Pier and Exposition Authority Act.10    (b) There shall be imposed an additional tax upon hotel 11operators at the rate of 1% of 94% of the gross rental receipts 12received by the hotel operator from engaging in business as a 13hotel operator, excluding, however, from gross rental 14receipts, the proceeds of such renting, leasing or letting to 15permanent residents of that hotel and proceeds from the tax 16imposed under subsection (c) of Section 13 of the Metropolitan 17Pier and Exposition Authority Act.18    (b-5) Beginning on July 1, 2024, if the renting, leasing, 19or letting of a hotel room is done through a re-renter of hotel 20rooms, then, subject to the provisions of Sections 3-2 and 213-3, the re-renter is the hotel operator for the purposes of 22the taxes under subsections (a) and (b). If the re-renter is 23headquartered outside of this State and has no presence in 24this State other than its business as a re-renter, conducted 25remotely, then, subject to the provisions of Sections 3-2 and 263-3, such re-renter is the hotel operator for the purposes of   SB3169- 3 -LRB104 20474 HLH 33944 b1the taxes under subsections (a) and (b) if it meets one of the 2following thresholds: 3        (1) the cumulative gross receipts from rentals in 4    Illinois by the re-renter of hotel rooms are $100,000 or 5    more; or 6        (2) the re-renter of hotel rooms cumulatively enters 7    into 200 or more separate transactions for rentals in 8    Illinois. 9    A re-renter of hotel rooms who is headquartered outside of 10this State and has no presence in this State other than its 11business as a re-renter, conducted remotely, shall determine 12on a quarterly basis, ending on the last day of March, June, 13September, and December, whether he or she meets the threshold 14of either paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection (b-5) for the 15preceding 12-month period. If such re-renter of hotel rooms 16meets the threshold of either paragraph (1) or (2) for a 1712-month period, he or she is subject to tax under this Act and 18is required to remit the tax imposed under this Act and file 19returns for the 12-month period beginning on the first day of 20the next month after he or she determines that he or she meets 21the threshold of paragraph (1) or (2). At the end of that 2212-month period, such re-renter of hotel rooms shall determine 23whether he or she continued to meet the threshold of either 24paragraph (1) or (2) during the preceding 12-month period. If 25he or she met the threshold in either paragraph (1) or (2) for 26the preceding 12-month period, he or she is a hotel operator in   SB3169- 4 -LRB104 20474 HLH 33944 b1this State and is required to remit the tax imposed under this 2Act and file returns for the subsequent 12-month period. If, 3at the end of a 12-month period during which such re-renter is 4required to remit the tax imposed under this Act, the 5re-renter determines that he or she did not meet the threshold 6in either paragraph (1) or (2) during the preceding 12-month 7period, he or she shall subsequently determine on a quarterly 8basis, ending on the last day of March, June, September, and 9December, whether he or she meets the threshold of either 10paragraph (1) or (2) for the preceding 12-month period. 11    (b-10) On and after January 1, 2027, an additional tax is 12imposed upon hosting platforms that facilitate the renting, 13leasing, or letting of short-term rentals. The tax under this 14subsection (b-10) is imposed at the rate of 4% of 94% of the 15gross rental receipts received by the platform from the 16renting, leasing, or letting of short-term rentals in this 17State. As used in this subsection, "short-term rental" means a 18furnished, house, apartment, or room that is available for 19rent for valuable consideration for a period of less than 30 20days but that is not otherwise considered a hotel under this 21Act. 22    (c) No funds received pursuant to this Act shall be used to 23advertise for or otherwise promote new competition in the 24hotel business.25    (d) However, such tax is not imposed upon the privilege of 26engaging in any business in Interstate Commerce or otherwise,   SB3169- 5 -LRB104 20474 HLH 33944 b1which business may not, under the Constitution and Statutes of 2the United States, be made the subject of taxation by this 3State. In addition, the tax is not imposed upon gross rental 4receipts for which the hotel operator is prohibited from 5obtaining reimbursement for the tax from the customer by 6reason of a federal treaty.7    (d-5) On and after July 1, 2017, the tax imposed by this 8Act shall not apply to gross rental receipts received by an 9entity that is organized and operated exclusively for 10religious purposes and possesses an active Exemption 11Identification Number issued by the Department pursuant to the 12Retailers' Occupation Tax Act when acting as a hotel operator 13renting, leasing, or letting rooms: 14        (1) in furtherance of the purposes for which it is 15    organized; or 16        (2) to entities that (i) are organized and operated 17    exclusively for religious purposes, (ii) possess an active 18    Exemption Identification Number issued by the Department 19    pursuant to the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, and (iii) 20    rent the rooms in furtherance of the purposes for which 21    they are organized. 22    No gross rental receipts are exempt under paragraph (2) of 23this subsection (d-5) unless the hotel operator obtains the 24active Exemption Identification Number from the exclusively 25religious entity to whom it is renting and maintains that 26number in its books and records. Gross rental receipts from   SB3169- 6 -LRB104 20474 HLH 33944 b1all rentals other than those described in items (1) or (2) of 2this subsection (d-5) are subject to the tax imposed by this 3Act unless otherwise exempt under this Act. 4    This subsection (d-5) is exempt from the sunset provisions 5of Section 3-5 of this Act. 6    (d-10) On and after July 1, 2023, the tax imposed by this 7Act shall not apply to gross rental receipts received from the 8renting, leasing, or letting of rooms to an entity that is 9organized and operated exclusively by an organization 10chartered by the United States Congress for the purpose of 11providing disaster relief and that possesses an active 12Exemption Identification Number issued by the Department 13pursuant to the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act if the renting, 14leasing, or letting of the rooms is in furtherance of the 15purposes for which the exempt organization is organized. This 16subsection (d-10) is exempt from the sunset provisions of 17Section 3-5 of this Act. 18    (e) Persons subject to the tax imposed by this Act may 19reimburse themselves for their tax liability under this Act by 20separately stating such tax as an additional charge, which 21charge may be stated in combination, in a single amount, with 22any tax imposed pursuant to Sections 8-3-13 and 8-3-14 of the 23Illinois Municipal Code, and Section 25.05-10 of "An Act to 24revise the law in relation to counties".25    (f) If any hotel operator collects an amount (however 26designated) which purports to reimburse such operator for   SB3169- 7 -LRB104 20474 HLH 33944 b1hotel operators' occupation tax liability measured by receipts 2which are not subject to hotel operators' occupation tax, or 3if any hotel operator, in collecting an amount (however 4designated) which purports to reimburse such operator for 5hotel operators' occupation tax liability measured by receipts 6which are subject to tax under this Act, collects more from the 7guest or re-renter than the operators' hotel operators' 8occupation tax liability in the transaction is, the guest or 9re-renter, as applicable, shall have a legal right to claim a 10refund of such amount from such operator. However, if such 11amount is not refunded to the guest or re-renter, as 12applicable, for any reason, the hotel operator is liable to 13pay such amount to the Department.14(Source: P.A. 103-9, eff. 6-7-23; 103-592, eff. 7-1-24.) 15    (35 ILCS 145/6)  (from Ch. 120, par. 481b.36)16    Sec. 6. Returns; allocation of proceeds. 17    (a) Except as provided hereinafter in this Section, on or 18before the last day of each calendar month, every person 19engaged as a hotel operator in this State during the preceding 20calendar month shall file a return with the Department, 21stating:22        1. the name of the operator;23        2. his residence address and the address of his 24    principal place of business and the address of the 25    principal place of business (if that is a different   SB3169- 8 -LRB104 20474 HLH 33944 b1    address) from which he engages in business as a hotel 2    operator in this State (including, if required by the 3    Department, the address of each hotel from which rental 4    receipts were received);5        3. total amount of rental receipts received by him 6    during the preceding calendar month from engaging in 7    business as a hotel operator during such preceding 8    calendar month;9        4. total amount of rental receipts received by him 10    during the preceding calendar month from renting, leasing 11    or letting rooms to permanent residents during such 12    preceding calendar month;13        5. total amount of other exclusions from gross rental 14    receipts allowed by this Act;15        6. gross rental receipts which were received by him 16    during the preceding calendar month and upon the basis of 17    which the tax is imposed;18        7. the amount of tax due;19        8. credit for any reimbursement of tax paid by a 20    re-renter of hotel rooms to hotel operators for rentals 21    purchased for re-rental, as provided in Section 3-3 of 22    this Act; 23        9. such other reasonable information as the Department 24    may require.25    If the operator's average monthly tax liability to the 26Department does not exceed $200, the Department may authorize   SB3169- 9 -LRB104 20474 HLH 33944 b1his returns to be filed on a quarter annual basis, with the 2return for January, February and March of a given year being 3due by April 30 of such year; with the return for April, May 4and June of a given year being due by July 31 of such year; 5with the return for July, August and September of a given year 6being due by October 31 of such year, and with the return for 7October, November and December of a given year being due by 8January 31 of the following year.9    If the operator's average monthly tax liability to the 10Department does not exceed $50, the Department may authorize 11his returns to be filed on an annual basis, with the return for 12a given year being due by January 31 of the following year.13    Such quarter annual and annual returns, as to form and 14substance, shall be subject to the same requirements as 15monthly returns.16    Notwithstanding any other provision in this Act concerning 17the time within which an operator may file his return, in the 18case of any operator who ceases to engage in a kind of business 19which makes him responsible for filing returns under this Act, 20such operator shall file a final return under this Act with the 21Department not more than one month after discontinuing such 22business.23    Where the same person has more than one business 24registered with the Department under separate registrations 25under this Act, such person shall not file each return that is 26due as a single return covering all such registered   SB3169- 10 -LRB104 20474 HLH 33944 b1businesses, but shall file separate returns for each such 2registered business.3    In his return, the operator shall determine the value of 4any consideration other than money received by him in 5connection with engaging in business as a hotel operator and 6he shall include such value in his return. Such determination 7shall be subject to review and revision by the Department in 8the manner hereinafter provided for the correction of returns.9    Where the operator is a corporation, the return filed on 10behalf of such corporation shall be signed by the president, 11vice-president, secretary or treasurer or by the properly 12accredited agent of such corporation.13    The person filing the return herein provided for shall, at 14the time of filing such return, pay to the Department the 15amount of tax herein imposed. The operator filing the return 16under this Section shall, at the time of filing such return, 17pay to the Department the amount of tax imposed by this Act 18less a discount of 2.1% or $25 per calendar year, whichever is 19greater, which is allowed to reimburse the operator for the 20expenses incurred in keeping records, preparing and filing 21returns, remitting the tax and supplying data to the 22Department on request.23    If any payment provided for in this Section exceeds the 24operator's liabilities under this Act, as shown on an original 25return, the Department may authorize the operator to credit 26such excess payment against liability subsequently to be   SB3169- 11 -LRB104 20474 HLH 33944 b1remitted to the Department under this Act, in accordance with 2reasonable rules adopted by the Department. If the Department 3subsequently determines that all or any part of the credit 4taken was not actually due to the operator, the operator's 5discount shall be reduced by an amount equal to the difference 6between the discount as applied to the credit taken and that 7actually due, and that operator shall be liable for penalties 8and interest on such difference. 9    (b) Until July 1, 2024, the Department shall deposit the 10total net revenue realized from the tax imposed under this Act 11as provided in this subsection (b). Beginning on July 1, 2024, 12the Department shall deposit the total net revenue realized 13from the tax imposed under this Act as provided in subsection 14(c). 15    There shall be deposited into the Build Illinois Fund in 16the State treasury for each State fiscal year 40% of the amount 17of total net revenue from the tax imposed by subsection (a) of 18Section 3. Of the remaining 60%: (i) $5,000,000 shall be 19deposited into the Illinois Sports Facilities Fund and 20credited to the Subsidy Account each fiscal year by making 21monthly deposits in the amount of 1/8 of $5,000,000 plus 22cumulative deficiencies in such deposits for prior months, and 23(ii) an amount equal to the then applicable Advance Amount, as 24defined in subsection (d), shall be deposited into the 25Illinois Sports Facilities Fund and credited to the Advance 26Account each fiscal year by making monthly deposits in the   SB3169- 12 -LRB104 20474 HLH 33944 b1amount of 1/8 of the then applicable Advance Amount plus any 2cumulative deficiencies in such deposits for prior months. 3(The deposits of the then applicable Advance Amount during 4each fiscal year shall be treated as advances of funds to the 5Illinois Sports Facilities Authority for its corporate 6purposes to the extent paid to the Authority or its trustee and 7shall be repaid into the General Revenue Fund in the State 8treasury by the State Treasurer on behalf of the Authority 9pursuant to Section 19 of the Illinois Sports Facilities 10Authority Act, as amended. If in any fiscal year the full 11amount of the then applicable Advance Amount is not repaid 12into the General Revenue Fund, then the deficiency shall be 13paid from the amount in the Local Government Distributive Fund 14that would otherwise be allocated to the City of Chicago under 15the State Revenue Sharing Act.)16    Of the remaining 60% of the amount of total net revenue 17beginning on August 1, 2011 through June 30, 2023, from the tax 18imposed by subsection (a) of Section 3 after all required 19deposits into the Illinois Sports Facilities Fund, an amount 20equal to 8% of the net revenue realized from this Act during 21the preceding month shall be deposited as follows: 18% of such 22amount shall be deposited into the Chicago Travel Industry 23Promotion Fund for the purposes described in subsection (n) of 24Section 5 of the Metropolitan Pier and Exposition Authority 25Act and the remaining 82% of such amount shall be deposited 26into the Local Tourism Fund each month for purposes authorized   SB3169- 13 -LRB104 20474 HLH 33944 b1by Section 605-705 of the Department of Commerce and Economic 2Opportunity Law. Beginning on August 1, 2011 and through June 330, 2023, an amount equal to 4.5% of the net revenue realized 4from this Act during the preceding month shall be deposited as 5follows: 55% of such amount shall be deposited into the 6Chicago Travel Industry Promotion Fund for the purposes 7described in subsection (n) of Section 5 of the Metropolitan 8Pier and Exposition Authority Act and the remaining 45% of 9such amount deposited into the International Tourism Fund for 10the purposes authorized in Section 605-707 of the Department 11of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law. 12    Beginning on July 1, 2023 and until July 1, 2024, of the 13remaining 60% of the amount of total net revenue realized from 14the tax imposed under subsection (a) of Section 3, after all 15required deposits into the Illinois Sports Facilities Fund: 16        (1) an amount equal to 8% of the net revenue realized 17    under this Act for the preceding month shall be deposited 18    as follows: 82% to the Local Tourism Fund and 18% to the 19    Chicago Travel Industry Promotion Fund; and20        (2) an amount equal to 4.5% of the net revenue 21    realized under this Act for the preceding month shall be 22    deposited as follows: 55% to the Chicago Travel Industry 23    Promotion Fund and 45% to the International Tourism Fund. 24    After making all these deposits, any remaining net revenue 25realized from the tax imposed under subsection (a) of Section 263 shall be deposited into the Tourism Promotion Fund in the   SB3169- 14 -LRB104 20474 HLH 33944 b1State treasury. All moneys received by the Department from the 2additional tax imposed under subsection (b) of Section 3 shall 3be deposited into the Build Illinois Fund in the State 4treasury.5    (c) Beginning on July 1, 2024, except as provided in 6subsection (c-5), the total net revenue realized from the tax 7imposed under this Act for the preceding month shall be 8deposited each month as follows: 9        (1) 50% shall be deposited into the Build Illinois 10    Fund; and 11        (2) the remaining 50% shall be deposited in the 12    following order of priority: 13            (A) First: 14                (i) $5,000,000 shall be deposited into the 15            Illinois Sports Facilities Fund and credited to 16            the Subsidy Account each fiscal year by making 17            monthly deposits in the amount of one-eighth of 18            $5,000,000 plus cumulative deficiencies in those 19            deposits for prior months; and 20                (ii) an amount equal to the then applicable 21            Advance Amount, as defined in subsection (d), 22            shall be deposited into the Illinois Sports 23            Facilities Fund and credited to the Advance 24            Account each fiscal year by making monthly 25            deposits in the amount of one-eighth of the then 26            applicable Advance Amount plus any cumulative   SB3169- 15 -LRB104 20474 HLH 33944 b1            deficiencies in such deposits for prior months; 2            the deposits of the then applicable Advance Amount 3            during each fiscal year shall be treated as 4            advances of funds to the Illinois Sports 5            Facilities Authority for its corporate purposes to 6            the extent paid to the Illinois Sports Facilities 7            Authority or its trustee and shall be repaid into 8            the General Revenue Fund in the State treasury by 9            the State Treasurer on behalf of the Authority 10            pursuant to Section 19 of the Illinois Sports 11            Facilities Authority Act; if, in any fiscal year, 12            the full amount of the Advance Amount is not 13            repaid into the General Revenue Fund, then the 14            deficiency shall be paid from the amount in the 15            Local Government Distributive Fund that would 16            otherwise be allocated to the City of Chicago 17            under the State Revenue Sharing Act; and 18            (B) after all required deposits into the Illinois 19        Sports Facilities Fund under paragraph (A) have been 20        made each month, the remainder shall be deposited as 21        follows: 22                (i) 56% into the Tourism Promotion Fund; 23                (ii) 23% into the Local Tourism Fund; 24                (iii) 14% into the Chicago Travel Industry 25            Promotion Fund; and 26                (iv) 7% into the International Tourism Fund.   SB3169- 16 -LRB104 20474 HLH 33944 b1    (c-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 100% of 2the proceeds received from the tax imposed on hosting 3platforms under subsection (b-10) of Section 3 shall be 4deposited into the Illinois Community Land Trust Fund. 5    (d) As used in subsections (b) and (c): 6    "Advance Amount" means, for fiscal year 2002, $22,179,000, 7and for subsequent fiscal years through fiscal year 2033, 8105.615% of the Advance Amount for the immediately preceding 9fiscal year, rounded up to the nearest $1,000. 10    "Net revenue realized" means the revenue collected by the 11State under this Act less the amount paid out as refunds to 12taxpayers for overpayment of liability under this Act. 13    (e) The Department may, upon separate written notice to a 14taxpayer, require the taxpayer to prepare and file with the 15Department on a form prescribed by the Department within not 16less than 60 days after receipt of the notice an annual 17information return for the tax year specified in the notice. 18Such annual return to the Department shall include a statement 19of gross receipts as shown by the operator's last State income 20tax return. If the total receipts of the business as reported 21in the State income tax return do not agree with the gross 22receipts reported to the Department for the same period, the 23operator shall attach to his annual information return a 24schedule showing a reconciliation of the 2 amounts and the 25reasons for the difference. The operator's annual information 26return to the Department shall also disclose payroll   SB3169- 17 -LRB104 20474 HLH 33944 b1information of the operator's business during the year covered 2by such return and any additional reasonable information which 3the Department deems would be helpful in determining the 4accuracy of the monthly, quarterly or annual tax returns by 5such operator as hereinbefore provided for in this Section.6    If the annual information return required by this Section 7is not filed when and as required the taxpayer shall be liable 8for a penalty in an amount determined in accordance with 9Section 3-4 of the Uniform Penalty and Interest Act until such 10return is filed as required, the penalty to be assessed and 11collected in the same manner as any other penalty provided for 12in this Act.13    The chief executive officer, proprietor, owner or highest 14ranking manager shall sign the annual return to certify the 15accuracy of the information contained therein. Any person who 16willfully signs the annual return containing false or 17inaccurate information shall be guilty of perjury and punished 18accordingly. The annual return form prescribed by the 19Department shall include a warning that the person signing the 20return may be liable for perjury.21    The foregoing portion of this Section concerning the 22filing of an annual information return shall not apply to an 23operator who is not required to file an income tax return with 24the United States Government.25(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-592, eff. 7-1-24; 26103-642, eff. 7-1-24; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.)   SB3169- 18 -LRB104 20474 HLH 33944 b1    Section 15. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 2Section 15-77 as follows: 3    (35 ILCS 200/15-77 new)4    Sec. 15-77. Community land trusts. Beginning in taxable 5year 2027, property that is owned by a non-profit community 6land trust, as defined in the Community Land Trust Home 7Ownership Act, and that is used exclusively for the creation 8and maintenance of permanently affordable single-family or 9multifamily residences is exempt beginning with the taxable 10year in which the property is acquired by the community land 11trust and continuing through the taxable year in which the 12property is sold to a homeowner. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.